District of Columbia statutes.
8-1825.03

General authorization and restrictions.

A colony may be kept in the District only if it is established and maintained in a manner consistent with this subchapter and any regulations promulgated pursuant to this subchapter.

Apr. 20, 2013, D.C. Law 19-262, § 213, 60 DCR 1300
Dec. 17, 2014, D.C. Law 20-142, § 411(b), 61 DCR 8045

History

The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-142 added “and any regulations promulgated pursuant to this subchapter” at the end.

Effect of Amendments

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-142: Section 502(h) of D.C. Law 20-142 provided that § 411 of the act shall apply as of December 17, 2014.

Editor's Notes